Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-432
Health care facility; health care service; licensure required.

A health care facility or health care service shall not be established, operated, or maintained in this state without first obtaining a license issued by the department under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act. No facility or service shall hold itself out as a health care facility or health care service or as providing health care services unless licensed under the act. The department shall issue a license to health care facilities and health care services that satisfy the requirements for licensure under the act.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 32;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 41.